Florida, session 2026, HB243.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
27
28 Section 1. Subsections (24) through (112) of section
29 316.003, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (25)
30 through (113), respectively, present subsections (47) and (65)
31 are amended, and a new subsection (24) is added to that section,
32 to read:
33 316.003 Definitions.—The following words and phrases, when
34 used in this chapter, shall have the meanings respectively
35 ascribed to them in this section, except where the context
36 otherwise requires:
37 (24) ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLE.—Any motorcycle powered by an
38 electric motor of 750 watts or more that is capable of a speed
39 greater than 28 miles per hour.
40 (48)(47) MOTORCYCLE.—Any motor vehicle having a seat or
41 saddle for the use of the rider and designed to travel on not
42 more than three wheels in contact with the ground. The term
43 includes an electric motorcycle and an autocycle, but does not
44 include a tractor, a moped, an electric bicycle, or any vehicle
45 in which the operator is enclosed by a cabin unless it meets the
46 requirements set forth by the National Highway Traffic Safety
47 Administration for a motorcycle.
48 (66)(65) PRIVATE ROAD OR DRIVEWAY.—Except as otherwise
49 provided in paragraph (91)(b) (90)(b), any privately owned way
50 or place used for vehicular travel by the owner and those having
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb243-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 243 2026
51 express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other
52 persons.
53 Section 2. Paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of
54 section 316.066, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
55 316.066 Written reports of crashes.—
56 (1)
57 (b) The Florida Traffic Crash Report, Long Form must
58 include:
59 1. The date, time, and location of the crash.
60 2. A description of the vehicles involved, including
61 whether the crash involved a motorized scooter, an electric
62 bicycle, or an electric motorcycle.
63 3. The names and addresses of the parties involved,
64 including all drivers and passengers, and the identification of
65 the vehicle in which each was a driver or a passenger.
66 4. The names and addresses of witnesses.
67 5. The name, badge number, and law enforcement agency of
68 the officer investigating the crash.
69 6. The names of the insurance companies for the respective
70 parties involved in the crash.
71 (c) In any crash for which a Florida Traffic Crash Report,
72 Long Form is not required by this section and which occurs on
73 the public roadways of this state, the law enforcement officer
74 shall complete a short-form crash report or provide a driver
75 exchange-of-information form, to be completed by all drivers and
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb243-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 243 2026
76 passengers involved in the crash, which requires the
77 identification of each vehicle that the drivers and passengers
78 were in. The short-form report must include:
79 1. The date, time, and location of the crash.
80 2. A description of the vehicles involved, including
81 whether the crash involved a motorized scooter, an electric
82 bicycle, or an electric motorcycle.
83 3. The names and addresses of the parties involved,
84 including all drivers and passengers, and the identification of
85 the vehicle in which each was a driver or a passenger.
86 4. The names and addresses of witnesses.
87 5. The name, badge number, and law enforcement agency of
88 the officer investigating the crash.
89 6. The names of the insurance companies for the respective
90 parties involved in the crash.
91 Section 3. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
92 316.068, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
93 316.068 Crash report forms.—
94 (2) Every crash report required to be made in writing must
95 be made on the appropriate form approved by the department and
96 must contain all the information required therein, including:
97 (b) A description of the vehicles involved, including
98 whether the crash involved a motorized scooter, an electric
99 bicycle, or an electric motorcycle;
100
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb243-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 243 2026
101 unless not available. A member of a railroad train crew or a
102 passenger on a railroad train is not a passenger for purposes of
103 this section. In the event of a crash involving a railroad
104 train, a member of the railroad train crew must furnish the
105 information in paragraphs (a), (b), (c), and (e) and, upon
106 request of the law enforcement officer having jurisdiction to
107 investigate the crash, the railroad train engineer's or
108 conductor's federal certification pursuant to 49 C.F.R. part 240
109 or part 242. The absence of information in such written crash
110 reports regarding the existence of passengers in the motor
111 vehicles involved in the crash constitutes a rebuttable
112 presumption that no such passengers were involved in the
113 reported crash. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this
114 section, a crash report produced electronically by a law
115 enforcement officer must, at a minimum, contain the same
116 information as is called for on those forms approved by the
117 department.
118 Section 4. Section 316.069, Florida Statutes, is amended
119 to read:
120 316.069 State to tabulate and analyze crash reports.—The
121 state shall tabulate and may analyze all crash reports and shall
122 publish, annually, or at more frequent intervals, statistical
123 information based thereon as to the number and circumstances of
124 traffic crashes. The state shall maintain separate statistics on
125 the number and location of crashes involving tandem trailer
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb243-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 243 2026
126 trucks, motorized scooters, electric bicycles, and electric
127 motorcycles.
128 Section 5. Subsections (3) and (4) of section 316.20655,
129 Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsections (10) and (11) are
130 added to that section, to read:
131 316.20655 Electric bicycle regulations.—
132 (3) Beginning January 1, 2021, Manufacturers and
133 distributors of electric bicycles shall apply a label that is
134 permanently affixed in a prominent location to each electric
135 bicycle. The label must contain the classification number, top
136 assisted speed, and motor wattage of the electric bicycle.
137 (4) A person may not tamper with or modify an electric
138 bicycle so as to change the motor-powered speed capability or
139 engagement of an electric bicycle. Any person who knowingly
140 modifies an electric bicycle as provided in this subsection
141 commits a noncriminal traffic infraction, punishable by a fine
142 of $100. Any person who commits a second or subsequent violation
143 of this subsection within 3 years after a previous violation
144 commits a noncriminal traffic infraction, punishable by a fine
145 of $250, unless the label indicating the classification number
146 required in subsection (3) is replaced after such modification.
147 (10)(a) A person may not operate or rent a class 3
148 electric bicycle unless he or she possesses a valid learner's
149 driver license or driver license. An operator of a class 3
150 electric bicycle must have his or her learner's driver license
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb243-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 243 2026
151 or driver license on his or her immediate possession at all
152 times when operating a class 3 electric bicycle and must present
153 or submit the same upon demand of a law enforcement officer or
154 an authorized representative of the department.
155 (b) A person who fails to comply with paragraph (a) must
156 first receive a verbal warning. Following the verbal warning, a
157 person who fails to comply with paragraph (a) commits a
158 noncriminal traffic infraction, punishable as a nonmoving
159 violation as provided in chapter 318.
160 (11) A person operating an electric bicycle on a shared
161 pathway that is not located adjacent to a roadway, including a
162 shared pathway located in a park or recreational area, must
163 yield to pedestrians and must give an audible signal before
164 overtaking and passing a pedestrian.
165 Section 6. Paragraph (a) of subsection (6) of section
166 316.2085, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
167 316.2085 Riding on motorcycles or mopeds.—
168 (6) A person under 16 years of age may not:
169 (a) Operate a motorcycle that has a motor with more than
170 150 cubic centimeters displacement or an electric motor of 750
171 watts or more.
172 Section 7. Subsection (26) of section 320.01, Florida
173 Statutes, is amended to read:
174 320.01 Definitions, general.—As used in the Florida
175 Statutes, except as otherwise provided, the term:
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb243-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 243 2026
176 (26) "Motorcycle" means any motor vehicle having a seat or
177 saddle for the use of the rider and designed to travel on not
178 more than three wheels in contact with the ground. The term
179 includes an electric motorcycle and an autocycle, as those terms
180 are defined in s. 316.003, but excludes a tractor, a moped, or
181 any vehicle in which the operator is enclosed by a cabin unless
182 it meets the requirements set forth by the National Highway
183 Traffic Safety Administration for a motorcycle.
184 Section 8. Subsection (28) of section 322.01, Florida
185 Statutes, is amended to read:
186 322.01 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
187 (28) "Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle powered by a motor
188 with a displacement of more than 50 cubic centimeters, having a
189 seat or saddle for the use of the rider, and designed to travel
190 on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, but
191 excluding a tractor, tri-vehicle, or moped. The term includes an
192 electric motorcycle as defined in s. 316.003.
193 Section 9. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
194 322.1615, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
195 322.1615 Learner's driver license.—
196 (1) The department may issue a learner's driver license to
197 a person who is at least 15 years of age and who:
198 (c) Has satisfactorily completed a driver education course
199 approved by the department which meets or exceeds the Department
200 of Education Driver Education/Traffic Safety-Classroom 1900300
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb243-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 243 2026
201 course version description and which includes content on sharing
202 the road with bicycles, including electric bicycles, motorized
203 scooters, and other vulnerable road users; and
204 Section 10. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
205 322.12, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
206 322.12 Examination of applicants.—
207 (3) For an applicant for a Class E driver license, such
208 examination shall include all of the following:
209 (c) A test of the applicant's ability to read and
210 understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing
211 traffic; his or her knowledge of the traffic laws of this state,
212 including laws regulating driving under the influence of alcohol
213 or controlled substances, driving with an unlawful blood-alcohol
214 level, and driving while intoxicated; and his or her knowledge
215 of the effects of alcohol and controlled substances upon persons
216 and the dangers of driving a motor vehicle while under the
217 influence of alcohol or controlled substances. At least 25
218 questions within the bank of test questions must address bicycle
219 and pedestrian safety. At least five of the 25 questions
220 addressing bicycle and pedestrian safety must specifically cover
221 safe electric bicycle and motorized scooter operation for all
222 road users.
223 Section 11. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
224 316.306, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
225 316.306 School and work zones; prohibition on the use of a
Page 9 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb243-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 243 2026
226 wireless communications device in a handheld manner.—
227 (3)(a)1. A person may not operate a motor vehicle while
228 using a wireless communications device in a handheld manner in a
229 designated school crossing, school zone, or work zone area as
230 defined in s. 316.003 s. 316.003(112). This subparagraph applies
231 shall only be applicable to work zone areas if construction
232 personnel are present or are operating equipment on the road or
233 immediately adjacent to the work zone area. For the purposes of
234 this paragraph, a motor vehicle that is stationary is not being
235 operated and is not subject to the prohibition in this
236 paragraph.
237 2. Effective January 1, 2020, A law enforcement officer
238 may stop motor vehicles and issue citations to persons who are
239 driving while using a wireless communications device in a
240 handheld manner in violation of subparagraph 1.
241 Section 12. Subsection (1) of section 655.960, Florida
242 Statutes, is amended to read:
243 655.960 Definitions; ss. 655.960-655.965.—As used in this
244 section and ss. 655.961-655.965, unless the context otherwise
245 requires:
246 (1) "Access area" means any paved walkway or sidewalk
247 which is within 50 feet of any automated teller machine. The
248 term does not include any street or highway open to the use of
249 the public, as defined in s. 316.003(91)(a) or (b) s.
250 316.003(90)(a) or (b), including any adjacent sidewalk, as
Page 10 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb243-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 243 2026
251 defined in s. 316.003.
252 Section 13. This act shall take effect July 1, 2027.
Page 11 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb243-00